apertium-eng-kaz1/apertium-eng-kaz.eng.dix
    <pardef n="sw/im__vblex">

                            <e i="">
      <p>
        <l>im</l>
        <r>im<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


                            <e i="">
      <p>
        <l>im</l>
        <r>im<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


                            <e i="">
      <p>
        <l>ims</l>
        <r>im<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


                            <e i="">
      <p>
        <l>am</l>
        <r>im<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


                            <e i="">
      <p>
        <l>um</l>
        <r>im<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


                            <e i="">
      <p>
        <l>imming</l>
        <r>im<s n="vblex"/><s n="ger"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


                            <e i="">
      <p>
        <l>imming</l>
        <r>im<s n="vblex"/><s n="pprs"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


                            <e i="">
      <p>
        <l>imming</l>
        <r>im<s n="vblex"/><s n="subs"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


    </pardef>

    <pardef n="t/each__vblex">

                            <e i="">
      <p>
        <l>each</l>
        <r>each<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


                            <e i="">
      <p>
        <l>each</l>
        <r>each<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


                            <e i="">
      <p>
        <l>eachs</l>
        <r>each<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


                            <e i="">
      <p>
        <l>aught</l>
        <r>each<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


                            <e i="">
      <p>
        <l>aught</l>
        <r>each<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


                            <e i="">
      <p>
        <l>eaching</l>
        <r>each<s n="vblex"/><s n="ger"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


                            <e i="">
      <p>
        <l>eaching</l>
        <r>each<s n="vblex"/><s n="pprs"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


                            <e i="">
      <p>
        <l>eaching</l>
        <r>each<s n="vblex"/><s n="subs"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


    </pardef>

    <pardef n="tr/ead__vblex">

                            <e i="">
      <p>
        <l>ead</l>
        <r>ead<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


                            <e i="">
      <p>
        <l>ead</l>
        <r>ead<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


                            <e i="">
      <p>
        <l>eads</l>
        <r>ead<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


                            <e i="">
      <p>
        <l>od</l>
        <r>ead<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


                            <e i="">
      <p>
        <l>od</l>
        <r>ead<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


                            <e r="LR" i="">
      <p>
        <l>odden</l>
        <r>ead<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


                            <e i="">
      <p>
        <l>eading</l>
        <r>ead<s n="vblex"/><s n="ger"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


                            <e i="">
      <p>
        <l>eading</l>
        <r>ead<s n="vblex"/><s n="pprs"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


                            <e i="">
      <p>
        <l>eading</l>
        <r>ead<s n="vblex"/><s n="subs"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


    </pardef>

    <pardef n="underl/ie__vblex">

                            <e i="">
      <p>
        <l>ie</l>
        <r>ie<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


                            <e i="">
      <p>
        <l>ie</l>
        <r>ie<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


                            <e i="">
      <p>
        <l>ies</l>
        <r>ie<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


                            <e i="">
      <p>
        <l>ay</l>
        <r>ie<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


                            <e i="">
      <p>
        <l>aid</l>
        <r>ie<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


                            <e i="">
      <p>
        <l>ying</l>
        <r>ie<s n="vblex"/><s n="ger"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


                            <e i="">
      <p>
        <l>ying</l>
        <r>ie<s n="vblex"/><s n="pprs"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


                            <e i="">
      <p>
        <l>ying</l>
        <r>ie<s n="vblex"/><s n="subs"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


    </pardef>

    <pardef n="w/in__vblex">

                            <e i="">
      <p>
        <l>in</l>
        <r>in<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


                            <e i="">
      <p>
        <l>in</l>
        <r>in<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


                            <e i="">
      <p>
        <l>ins</l>
        <r>in<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


                            <e i="">
      <p>
        <l>on</l>
        <r>in<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


                            <e i="">
      <p>
        <l>on</l>
        <r>in<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


                            <e i="">
      <p>
        <l>inning</l>
        <r>in<s n="vblex"/><s n="ger"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


                            <e i="">
      <p>
        <l>inning</l>
        <r>in<s n="vblex"/><s n="pprs"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


                            <e i="">
      <p>
        <l>inning</l>
        <r>in<s n="vblex"/><s n="subs"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


    </pardef>

    <pardef n="wr/eak__vblex">

                            <e i="">
      <p>
        <l>eak</l>
        <r>eak<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


                            <e i="">
      <p>
        <l>eak</l>
        <r>eak<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


                            <e i="">
      <p>
        <l>eaks</l>
        <r>eak<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


                            <e i="">
      <p>
        <l>ought</l>
        <r>eak<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


                            <e r="LR" i="">
      <p>
        <l>eaked</l>
        <r>eak<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


                            <e i="">
      <p>
        <l>ought</l>
        <r>eak<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


                            <e r="LR" i="">
      <p>
        <l>eaked</l>
        <r>eak<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


                            <e i="">
      <p>
        <l>eaking</l>
        <r>eak<s n="vblex"/><s n="ger"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


                            <e i="">
      <p>
        <l>eaking</l>
        <r>eak<s n="vblex"/><s n="pprs"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


                            <e i="">
      <p>
        <l>eaking</l>
        <r>eak<s n="vblex"/><s n="subs"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


    </pardef>

                            <e lm="swim" i=""><i>sw</i><par n="sw/im__vblex"/></e>
                            <e lm="teach" i=""><i>t</i><par n="t/each__vblex"/></e>
                            <e lm="win" i=""><i>w</i><par n="w/in__vblex"/></e>
                            <e lm="win on points" i=""><i>w</i><par n="w/in__vblex"/><p><l><b/>on<b/>points</l><r><g><b/>on<b/>points</g></r></p></e>
                            <e lm="teach to read and write" i=""><i>t</i><par n="t/each__vblex"/><p><l><b/>to<b/>read<b/>and<b/>write</l><r><g><b/>to<b/>read<b/>and<b/>write</g></r></p></e>
                            <e lm="swim" i=""><i>sw</i><par n="sw/im__vblex"/></e>
                            <e lm="teach" i=""><i>t</i><par n="t/each__vblex"/></e>
                            <e lm="win" i=""><i>w</i><par n="w/in__vblex"/></e>
